Maryland, session 2026, HB1074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated unless:
(1) the context clearly requires a different meaning; or
(2) a different definition is adopted for a particular provision.
(gg) “Qualifying relative” means a spouse, parent, child, brother, [or] sister,
SON–IN–LAW, OR DAUGHTER–IN–LAW.
5–501.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, an official or
employee may not participate in a matter if:
(1) the official or employee or a qualifying relative of the official or
employee has an interest in the matter and the official or employee knows of the interest;
or
(2) any of the following is a party to the matter:
(i) a business entity in which the official or employee has a direct
financial interest of which the official or employee reasonably may be expected to know;
(ii) a business entity, including a limited liability company or a
limited liability partnership, of which any of the following is an officer, a director, a trustee,
a partner, or an employee:
1. the official or employee; or
2. if known to the official or employee, a qualifying relative
of the official or employee;
(iii) a business entity with which any of the following has applied for
a position, is negotiating employment, or has arranged prospective employment:

HOUSE BILL 1074 3
1. the official or employee; or
2. if known to the official or employee, a qualifying relative
of the official or employee;
(iv) if the contract reasonably could be expected to result in a conflict
between the private interest and the official State duties of the official or employee, a
business entity that is a party to a contract with:
1. the official or employee; or
2. if known to the official or employee, a qualifying relative
of the official or employee;
(v) a business entity, either engaged in a transaction with the State
or subject to regulation by the official’s or employee’s governmental unit, in which a direct
financial interest is owned by another business entity if the official or employee:
1. has a direct financial interest in the other business entity;
and
2. reasonably may be expected to know of both financial
interests; or
(vi) a business entity that:
1. the official or employee knows is a creditor or an obligee of
the official or employee, or of a qualifying relative of the official or employee, with respect
to a thing of economic value; and
2. as a creditor or an obligee, is in a position to affect directly
and substantially the interest of the official, employee, or qualifying relative.
(a–1) (1) This subsection does not apply to an individual who is a public official
only as a member of a board and who receives annual compensation that is less than 25%
of the lowest annual compensation at State grade level 16.
(2) A former regulated lobbyist who is or becomes subject to regulation
under this title as a public official or employee may not participate in a case, contract, or
other specific matter as a public official or employee for 1 year after the termination of the
registration of the former regulated lobbyist if the former regulated lobbyist previously
assisted or represented another party for compensation in the matter.
(b) (1) The prohibitions of subsection (a) of this section do not apply if
participation is allowed:

HOUSE BILL 1074
(i) as to officials and employees subject to the authority of the Ethics
Commission, by regulation of the Ethics Commission;
(ii) by the opinion of an advisory body; or
(iii) by another provision of this subtitle.
(2) This section does not prohibit participation by an official or employee
that is limited to the exercise of an administrative or ministerial duty that does not affect
the decision or disposition with respect to the matter.
(c) (1) An official or employee who otherwise would be disqualified from
participation under subsection (a) of this section shall disclose the nature and
circumstances of the conflict, and may participate or act, if:
(i) the disqualification would leave a body with less than a quorum
capable of acting;
(ii) the disqualified official or employee is required by law to act; or
(iii) the disqualified official or employee is the only individual
authorized to act.
(2) If the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Treasurer, or
Comptroller is required to make a disclosure under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Treasurer, or Comptroller, as
appropriate, shall send a copy of the disclosure to the presiding officers of the General
Assembly and to the Ethics Commission.
(d) (1) This subsection applies only to:
(i) the Governor;
(ii) the Lieutenant Governor;
(iii) the Attorney General;
(iv) the Treasurer;
(v) the Comptroller; and
(vi) a secretary of a principal department in the Executive Branch.
(2) (i) An official who takes executive action that the official knows or
reasonably should know would have a material financial impact on the official or a person
whose interests are attributable to the official under § 5–608 of this title shall provide the

HOUSE BILL 1074 5
Ethics Commission and the Joint Ethics Committee a description of the executive action
and the circumstances of the potential impact.
(ii) An official is not required to make a disclosure under this
paragraph if the impact is common to all members of:
1. the general public or a large class of the general public; or
2. a profession or occupation of which the official is a
member.
5–807.
(a) Subject to § 5–209 of this title, each county and each municipal corporation
shall enact provisions to govern the public ethics of local officials relating to:
(1) conflicts of interest;
(2) financial disclosure; and
(3) lobbying.
5–808.
(a) [Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the] THE conflict of
interest provisions enacted by a county or municipal corporation under § 5–807 of this
subtitle:
(1) shall be [similar to the provisions] EQUIVALENT TO OR EXCEED THE
REQUIREMENTS of Subtitle 5 of this title; but
(2) in accordance with regulations adopted by the Ethics Commission and
consistent with the intent of this title, may be modified to the extent necessary to make the
provisions relevant to the prevention of conflicts of interest in that jurisdiction.
[(b) The conflict of interest provisions for elected local officials enacted by a county
or municipal corporation under § 5–807 of this subtitle:
(1) shall be equivalent to or exceed the requirements of Subtitle 5 of this
title; but
(2) in accordance with regulations adopted by the Ethics Commission and
consistent with the intent of this title, may be modified to the extent necessary to make the
provisions relevant to the prevention of conflicts of interest in that jurisdiction.]

HOUSE BILL 1074
(B) THE CONFLICT OF INTEREST PROVISIONS ENACTED BY A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION SHALL INCLUDE A PROVISION THAT IS EQUIVALENT TO
OR EXCEEDS THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 5–902 OF THIS TITLE.
5–810.
The lobbying provisions enacted by a county or municipal corporation under § 5–807
of this subtitle:
(1) shall be [substantially similar to the provisions] EQUIVALENT TO OR
EXCEED THE REQUIREMENTS of Subtitle 7 of this title; but
(2) (i) shall be modified to the extent necessary to make the provisions
relevant to that jurisdiction; and
(ii) may be further modified to the extent considered necessary and
appropriate by and for that jurisdiction.
5–811.1.
[(a) This section applies only in Calvert County.
(b)] The [county’s] conflict of interest provisions required under § 5–807(a)(1) of
this subtitle shall:
(1) include a law or regulation that is equivalent to or exceeds the
requirements of § 5–902 of this title[.];
(2) AUTHORIZE THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION TO REMOVE A MEMBER OF THE GOVERNING BODY FROM OFFICE FOR
A VIOLATION OF THE CONFLICT OF INTEREST PROVISIONS; AND
[(c) The county’s ethics provisions shall include a law or regulation that requires
the Calvert County Ethics Commission to]
(3) REQUIRE THAT THE COUNTY’S OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION’S
ETHICS COMMISSION make public any recommendation it makes to expel a
[Commissioner] MEMBER OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION.
5–817.
(a) In accordance with this section, a school board:

HOUSE BILL 1074 7
(1) may adopt conflict of interest regulations applicable to officials and
employees of the school system; and
(2) shall adopt conflict of interest regulations applicable to members of the
school board.
(b) (1) The conflict of interest regulations adopted by a school board under
subsection [(a)(1)] (A) of this section:
(i) shall be [similar to the provisions of] EQUIVALENT TO OR
EXCEED THE REQUIREMENTS OF Subtitle 5 of this title; but
(ii) in accordance with regulations adopted by the Ethics
Commission and consistent with the intent of this title, may be modified to the extent
necessary to make the regulations relevant to the prevention of conflicts of interest in that
school system.
(2) [The] IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE conflict of interest regulations adopted by a school board
under subsection (a)(2) of this section SHALL:
(i) [shall be equivalent to or exceed the requirements of Subtitle 5
of this title; but
(ii) in accordance with regulations adopted by the Ethics
Commission and consistent with the intent of this title, may be modified to the extent
necessary to make the regulations relevant to the prevention of conflicts of interest in that
school system] INCLUDE A REGULATION THAT IS EQUIVALENT TO OR EXCEEDS THE
REQUIREMENTS OF § 5–902 OF THIS TITLE;
(II) AUTHORIZE THE SCHOOL BOARD TO REMOVE A MEMBER OF
THE SCHOOL BOARD FROM OFFICE FOR A VIOLATION OF THE CONFLICT OF
INTEREST REGULATIONS; AND
(III) REQUIRE THAT THE SCHOOL BOARD’S ETHICS COMMISSION
MAKE PUBLIC ANY RECOMMENDATION TO REMOVE A MEMBER OF THE SCHOOL
BOARD.
(c) Unless a school board adopts and maintains conflict of interest regulations
under subsection (a)(1) of this section, the provisions enacted by the county under § 5–808
of this subtitle shall apply to officials and employees of that school system.
5–819.

HOUSE BILL 1074
(a) In accordance with this section, a school board [may] SHALL adopt regulations
relating to lobbying of members of the school board and of officials and employees of the
school system.
(b) The lobbying regulations adopted by a school board under subsection (a) of
this section:
(1) shall be [substantially similar to] EQUIVALENT TO OR EXCEED the
provisions of Subtitle 7 of this title; but
(2) [(i) may be modified to the extent necessary to make the provisions
relevant to that school system; and
(ii) may be further modified to the extent considered necessary and
appropriate by and for that school system] IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS
ADOPTED BY THE ETHICS COMMISSION AND CONSISTENT WITH THE INTENT OF THIS
TITLE, MAY BE MODIFIED TO THE EXTENT NECESSARY TO MAKE THE REGULATIONS
RELEVANT TO THAT SCHOOL SYSTEM.
[(c) Unless a school board adopts and maintains lobbying regulations under this
subtitle, the provisions enacted by the county under § 5–810 of this subtitle shall apply to
that school system.]
5–902.
(a) The court may compel compliance with the Ethics Commission’s order by:
(1) issuing an order to cease and desist from the violation; or
(2) granting other injunctive relief.
(b) (1) The court may also:
(i) impose a fine:
1. not exceeding $5,000 for a violation of this title;
2. with each day that the violation occurs being a separate
offense; and
3. which shall be paid to the State Treasurer and deposited
in the General Fund; or
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, void an
official act of an official or employee if:

HOUSE BILL 1074 9
1. the official or employee had a conflict of interest that is
prohibited by this title;
2. the act arose from or concerned the subject matter of the
conflict;
3. the proceeding was brought within 90 days after the act
occurred; and
4. the court determines that the conflict had an impact on the
act.
(2) The court may not void an official act that:
(i) appropriates public funds;
(ii) imposes a tax; or
(iii) provides for the issuance of a bond, a note, or any other evidence
of public obligation.
(c) After hearing the case, the court may grant all or part of the relief sought.
Article – Local Government
12–107.
(a) [This section applies to all counties except Baltimore City.
(b)] The provisions of §§ 9–105 and 9–106 of this article apply to an act, an
ordinance, or a resolution adopted by a commission county under this section.
[(c)] (B) The governing body of a county may enact a law or regulation:
(1) designed to prevent conflicts between the private interests and public
duties of county officers or employees, including the governing body; and
(2) to govern the conduct and actions of county officers and employees,
including the governing body, in performing their public duties.
[(d)] (C) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the
governing body of a county may enact a law or regulation to provide for a penalty, including
a fine, a forfeiture, an imprisonment, or a removal from office for violation of any law or
regulation enacted under subsection [(c)] (B) of this section.

HOUSE BILL 1074
(2) The governing body of [Calvert County] A COUNTY shall enact a law or
regulation that authorizes the governing body to remove a county elected official from office
for violations of any law or regulation enacted under subsection [(c)] (B) of this section or
§ 5–807(a)(1) of the General Provisions Article relating to conflicts of interest.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.